District of Columbia statutes.
38-2703

Assistance to the University of the District of Columbia.

(a)

In General. —

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the Secretary may provide financial assistance to the University of the District of Columbia for the fiscal year to enable the university to carry out activities authorized under part B of title III of the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. § 1060 et seq.).

(b)

Authorization of Appropriations. —

There are authorized to be appropriated to the District of Columbia to carry out this section $1,500,000 for fiscal year 2000 and such sums as may be necessary for each of the five succeeding fiscal years.

(c)

Special Rule. —

For any fiscal year, the University of the District of Columbia may receive financial assistance pursuant to this section, or pursuant to part B of title III of the Higher Education Act of 1965 [20 U.S.C. § 1060 et seq.], but not pursuant to both this section and such part B.

Nov. 12, 1999, 113 Stat. 1327, Pub. L. 106-98, § 4
Delegation of authority under Public Law 106-98, the “District of Columbia College Access Act of 1999”, see Mayor’s Order 2000-45, March 24, 2000 ( 47 DCR 4720).